Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1881SV (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 384 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 327G.26 Closed crossing ââ required 1 notices. 2 1. A railway corporation shall provide notice of a railway 3 crossing closure for repairs or upgrades to the governmental 4 entity that has jurisdiction over the crossing not fewer than 5 thirty days prior to closing the crossing, unless the closure 6 could not reasonably be anticipated thirty days in advance 7 or occurs in the event of an emergency. The notice must 8 include an estimated date by which the repairs or upgrades 9 will be completed. A railway corporation shall also notify 10 the governmental entity as soon as practicable if the repairs 11 or upgrades will be completed after the initial estimated 12 completion date. 13 2. A railway corporation violating this section shall, upon 14 conviction, be guilty of a schedule âoneâ penalty under section 15 327C.5. 16